Massachusetts, session 194th, H665.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 38G of Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out the first paragraph of the definition of “Standard educator certificate” and replacing
it with the following:
"Standard educator certificate" shall be a license to teach issued to a person who has
successfully met the preparation and eligibility requirements as established by the board. The
standard educator certificate shall be valid for renewable terms of five years. A teacher may
qualify for a standard educator certificate upon completing the following requirements: (1)
holding a provisional educator certificate for at least five years, (2) successfully demonstrating
teaching proficiency through performance evaluations and evidence of student learning, (3)
meeting subject matter knowledge requirements established by the board, and (4) completing a
professional development plan that satisfies the criteria set forth by the board, which must be
approved by the local school district.
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 38G of Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out the following paragraph:
“In not less than one year after the issuance of a provisional educator certificate, the
commissioner upon receipt of a proper application shall issue a standard educator certificate to
such provisional certificate holder who has provided the commissioner with evidence, in such
manner and form as prescribed by the board, that he has met the preparation and eligibility
requirements set by the board through a master's degree program approved by the commissioner,
or through an equivalent district program for standard certification approved by the
commissioner, or other equivalent programs approved by the commissioner; and has met the
requirements set by the commissioner for demonstration of successful performance.”
and replacing it with the following:
“In not less than one year after the issuance of a provisional educator certificate, the
commissioner, upon receipt of a proper application, shall issue a standard educator certificate to
such provisional certificate holder who has provided evidence, in such manner and form as
prescribed by the board, that the individual has:
(i) successfully completed at least five years of service as a provisional educator in a
Massachusetts public school district;
(ii) demonstrated satisfactory performance based on district evaluations, which shall
include evidence of student learning and growth, instructional effectiveness, and classroom
management, as determined by district evaluations and the board's established guidelines;
of 3

(iii) completed a professional development plan that satisfies the standards set by the
board, which must be approved by the local school district and include continued education in
teaching strategies, content knowledge, and classroom management, aligned with state and
district goals for improving student outcomes; and
(iv) met subject matter knowledge and teaching skill standards established by the board
through assessments, observations, or portfolio reviews that demonstrate proficiency in the
subject area(s) being taught.”
SECTION 3. The Board of Education is hereby authorized to revise its regulations to
eliminate the requirement of a master's degree for obtaining a standard educator certificate and to
establish new pathways to achieve standard educator status based on demonstrated performance,
professional development, and classroom experience.
SECTION 4. The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (DESE) shall
issue guidelines and instructions to school districts for the implementation of this new pathway
to certification. These guidelines shall ensure that teachers who have completed five years of
teaching service under a provisional educator certificate have the opportunity to obtain a
standard educator certificate based on performance evaluations, professional development, and
subject matter proficiency.
SECTION 5. The Board of Education shall prepare a report within 12 months of the
enactment of this law, analyzing the impact of removing the master’s degree requirement on
teacher retention, student outcomes, and professional development, and provide
recommendations for any additional supports that may be needed for the successful
implementation of this new certification process.
of 3